North Dakota, session 69, HB1211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 49-02-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
49-02-26. Qualifying for renewable electricity and recycled energy credits - Exception for
certain hydroelectric facilities.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, forFor purposes of qualifying for renewable electricity
and recycled energy credits, electricity must be generated from a source identified in section 49-02-25.
For electricity generated from hydroelectric facilities, the hydroelectric facility must have an inservice
date of January 1, 2007, or later, or be new hydroelectric generation obtained from repowering or
efficiency improvements to hydroelectric facilities existing on August 1, 2007.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 49-02-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
49-02-29. Qualifying for renewable electricity and recycled energy objective.
For purposes of qualifying for the renewable electricity and recycled energy objective contained in
section 49-02-28, electricity, except for electricity generated from a hydroelectric facility with an
inservice date before January 1, 2007, and electricity that is not obtained from repowering or efficiency
improvements to a hydropower facility existing on August 1, 2007, regardless of the source's inservice
date, qualifies for meeting the statewide objective provided that the source meets the requirements of
the North Dakota public service commission's rules for tracking, recording, and verifying renewable
energy certificates.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 49-02-31 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
49-02-31. Purchase and retirement of renewable energy and recycled energy certificates to
meet the objective.
A portion or all of the renewable energy and recycled energy objective may be met by the purchase
and retirement of renewable energy and recycled energy certificates representing credits from qualified
sources and facilities as defineddescribed in sectionssection 49-02-26 and 49-02-30. Renewable
energy and recycled energy certificates do not need to be acquired from an in-state facility.
SECTION 4. REPEAL. Section 49-02-30 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.

H. B. NO. 1211 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1211.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 1 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State